Mississippi statutes. Title 21. Municipalities
Chapter 41. Special Improvements
§ 21-41-45.
Obligations not to exceed cost of improvements; authorization and procedures for interim financing in anticipation of borrowing for local improvements.

The obligations so authorized by Section 21-41-41 may be issued at any time after the estimated cost of the special improvements shall have been ascertained by the governing authorities of the municipality, and the amount of indebtedness thereby incurred shall not exceed the estimated cost of such special improvements.

Any municipality which determines by resolution to borrow money under the authority of Section 21-41-41 may obtain interim financing in anticipation of such borrowing for one (1) or more of the local improvements authorized by Section 21-41-3 at any time after the estimated cost of each such improvement to be so financed has been ascertained. Such interim financing may be upon such terms and conditions and may bear interest at such rate or rates as are agreed between the municipality and the party advancing the interim funds or the purchaser of the obligations evidencing such indebtedness; provided, however, the maximum rate of interest thereon shall not exceed that established in Section 75-17-101, Mississippi Code of 1972.

Such interim financing shall be secured by and repaid from the proceeds of the permanent financing issued under this chapter and may be further secured by any earnings on the investment of the proceeds of the interim financing.

The final maturity of such interim financing shall not exceed three (3) years after the completion date of any improvement being financed, as certified by the city engineer. Provided, however, that if the governing authorities of the municipality, after a good faith effort, determine by resolution that permanent financing under Section 21-41-41 cannot be obtained, the municipality may renew the interim financing for additional periods of six (6) months until such permanent financing can be obtained. The municipality may enter into agreements with one (1) or more lenders at any time obligating such lenders to provide renewal interim financing upon such terms and conditions as may be agreed by the municipality and the lenders.

The same terms and conditions with respect to the giving of notice, presentation of petitions and holding of an election established in Sections 21-33-307 through 21-33-311, Mississippi Code of 1972, for the issuance of municipal bonds shall apply before a municipality may borrow money under the provisions of this section. Such borrowing shall be authorized by resolution of the governing authorities of the municipality and may be evidenced by a note or notes in negotiable form with coupons or fully-registered form without coupons. The indebtedness incurred hereunder shall not be considered when computing any limitation of indebtedness imposed by law on the municipality.

Such borrowing, whether or not evidenced by a negotiable note or notes, may be placed or sold at public or private sale for such price, in such manner and at such time or times as may be determined by the governing authorities of the municipality. All expenses, premiums and commissions deemed necessary or advantageous in connection with the issuance thereof may be paid by the municipality.

This section, without reference to any other statute, shall be deemed full and complete authority for the borrowing of such interim funds and the issuance of a note or notes to evidence such indebtedness, and shall be construed as an additional and alternative method therefor. None of the present restrictions, requirements, conditions or limitations of law applicable to the issuance or sale of bonds, notes or other obligations by municipalities shall apply to the borrowing of funds hereunder. No proceedings shall be required for the borrowing of such funds other than those provided for and required herein, and all powers necessary to be exercised in order to carry out the provisions hereof are hereby conferred.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 2573; 1942, § 3664-21; Laws, 1924, ch. 194; Laws, 1950, 495, § 21; Laws, 1987, ch. 414, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1987.

§ 21-41-47.
Obligations excepted from the limitations of indebtedness.

All bonds, notes or other obligations heretofore or hereafter issued by the municipalities of the state, for so much of the cost of the local improvements as shall have been or shall be assessed against property specially benefited by said improvements or shall have been paid for by said issuing municipality, shall be excepted from any limitations of indebtedness prescribed by the special charters of such municipalities or by any special or general law, and said bonds, notes or other obligations shall not be considered indebtedness of said municipalities in applying said limitations of indebtedness. It shall not be necessary for any municipality to secure the approval of its qualified electors to borrow the money or issue its obligations incurred in the doing of such local improvements, but such acts may be done without an election and without giving notice of intention to do so.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 2578; 1942, § 3664-22; Laws, 1924, ch. 194; Laws, 1950, ch. 495, § 22, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-41-49.
Refunding special assessment bonds.

Where any municipality has issued bonds for special improvements, and special assessments have been levied to pay for said bonds, or wherein the municipality was to have paid a portion or all of said bonds under any special improvement law by which said bonds were issued, and said installments for special improvements have not been collected, or funds for the payment of said bonds are not on hand, such municipality is hereby authorized to issue refunding bonds in the manner provided by general law for the refunding of bonds by municipalities.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 2566; 1942, § 3664-14; Laws, 1931, ch. 19; Laws, 1950, ch. 495, § 14, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-41-51.
Method of publishing notice.

Except as may be otherwise provided, where, by any provision of this chapter, notice is required to be given by publication, such publication made shall be in a newspaper published in the municipality, if there be one. If there be no newspaper published in the municipality, then such notice shall be posted for the prescribed period of time in at least five public places in the municipality, one of which shall be the city or town hall, or the place of meeting of the governing authorities, if there be no city or town hall.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 2569; 1942, § 3664-18; Laws, 1924, ch. 194; Laws, 1950, ch. 495, § 18, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-41-53.
Contracts for work to be let as other contracts for public work.

All work upon the improvements authorized by Section 21-41-3, shall be undertaken and contracts therefor, if any, shall be let and awarded in the manner provided by the law or the charter of the municipality.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 2568; 1942, § 3664-17; Laws, 1924, ch. 194; Laws, 1950, ch. 495, § 17, eff from and after July 1, 1950.